Illinois, session 104th, SB951.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Online Personal Protection Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 85/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Student Online Personal Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17.)